Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.01, subdivision 1d, is amended to read: Subd. 1d. Application or use of a pesticide. "Application or use of a pesticide" includes: (1) the dispersal of a pesticide on, in, at, or directed toward a target site;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) preapplication activities that involve the mixing and loading of a restricted use pesticide; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end other restricted use pesticide-related activities, including but not limited to transporting or storing pesticide containers that have been opened; new text begin mixing; loading; new text end cleaning equipment; and disposing of excess pesticides, spray mix, equipment wash waters, pesticide containers, and other materials that contain pesticide. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10c. new text end new text begin Handler. new text end new text begin "Handler" means an individual who meets all the requirements specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 171.201, and engages in preapplication activities that involve the mixing and loading of a restricted use pesticide under the supervision of a licensed pesticide applicator. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.30, is amended to read: 18B.30 PESTICIDE USE LICENSE REQUIREMENT; INTERNET SALES PROHIBITED; RESTRICTED USE PESTICIDES. (a) A person may not use a restricted use pesticide without a license or certification required under sections 18B.29 to 18B.35 and the use may only be done under conditions prescribed by the commissionernew text begin , except that a handler may engage in preapplication activities that involve the mixing and loading of a restricted use pesticide under the supervision of a licensed pesticide applicatornew text end . (b) A person shall not sell any pesticide labeled for restricted use over an Internet website to a Minnesota resident who is not a licensed or certified pesticide applicator. A person selling a pesticide labeled for restricted use over an Internet website to a Minnesota resident must verify that the purchaser is a licensed or certified pesticide applicator under sections 18B.29 to 18B.35.